Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 8 Regulation of Sales

3-8-1.
Sales on Sundays and holidays — Sales to underage persons, intoxicated persons, and persons of intemperate habits.

Licenses issued under this title shall not authorize the sale or service of beverages on Sunday, nor on Christmas day excepting licensed taverns, clubs, victualing houses, and retail Class F licensed places when served with food to guests, and except in places operated under a retail Class E license described in this title, and excepting the sale of wine or winery products at retail pursuant to §

3-6-1.1(e)(4)

by holders of farmer-winery licenses and the serving of complimentary samples pursuant to §

3-6-1.1(g)

by holders of farmer-winery licenses, except in cars or on passenger-carrying marine vessels operated by holders of Class G licenses, and except as otherwise provided herein. The department may limit the sale of beverages on passenger-carrying marine vessels to the hours from twelve o’clock (12:00) p.m. to six o’clock (6:00) p.m. on those days; nor shall they authorize the sale or delivery to any underaged person as defined in this title for purposes of sale, possession, and consumption of alcoholic beverages, either for his or her own use or for the use of his or her parents, or of any other person; or the sale of beverages to any intoxicated persons or to any person of notoriously intemperate habits. Places operating under a retail Class C license are authorized to be open for the sale of alcoholic beverages upon Columbus day, Armistice day, and Victory day, provided however, that a local board of license may authorize places operating under a Class C license to be open on New Year’s day. A Class C licensee may serve beverages on Sunday with the written approval of the local board of license, subject to the notice provisions of §

3-5-17

. Places operating under a retail Class A license are not authorized to be open for the sale of alcoholic beverages upon Thanksgiving day. Provided, however, that holders of Class A licenses may open from no earlier than ten o’clock (10:00) a.m. to no later than six o’clock (6:00) p.m. on Sundays, unless the following Monday is a holiday, in which event the holders may remain open no later than nine o’clock (9:00) p.m. the prior Sunday.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 18; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 5; P.L. 1936, ch. 2338, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; P.L. 1953, ch. 3229, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-8-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 485, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 17, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 13, § 1, effective May 19, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 14, § 1, effective May 19, 2021.

3-8-1.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 239, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 1.

3-8-2.
Age restriction for bartenders.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) may act as a bartender for the purposes of mixing, preparing, serving, or selling from a bar used for the purpose of dispensing beverages in any licensed establishment operating under a Class B-C-D-F or F1-G-J or K license.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3614, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 2.

3-8-3.
Suspension of license for employment of underage bartender.

Any licensee who violates, or permits to be violated, the provisions of §

3-8-2

is subject to the suspension of license for a period of at least three (3) calendar days for the first offense. If additional violations occur, the number of calendar days of suspension shall be determined by the department.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3614, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 11.

3-8-4.
Drinking by or hiring of underage persons.

Use of a credit card for the purchase of beverages may be permitted by all classes of license holders and, notwithstanding the purchase of alcoholic beverages by credit card, license holders shall not sell or furnish beverages to any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday to drink any beverage upon any licensed premises.

Licensees shall not hire any persons who have not reached their eighteenth (18th) birthday to sell or serve beverages in any place where those beverages may be consumed on the premises where sold.

License holders may enforce a prohibition against any patron who has not reached his or her twenty-first birthday from entering the licensed establishment after ten o’clock (10:00) p.m..

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 19; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-8-4

; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 614, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 71, § 1.

3-8-5.
Penalty for violations relating to underage persons.

Any person who sells or suffers to be sold or delivered any beverage to a person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday either for his or her own use or the use of his or her parents or any other person, or allows any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday to drink beverages on premises licensed under this title or suffers or allows any persons who have not reached their eighteenth (18th) birthday to sell or serve any beverage on the premises shall for the first offense be subject to a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250); for the second offense, be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), and for the third and any subsequent offense, be subject to a fine of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750). In the event that there are no offenses in three (3) successive years from the date of the last offense, then the next offense shall be treated as a first offense. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent licensees from hiring any person who has reached his or her eighteenth birthday.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 31; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2177, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-8-5

; P.L. 1975, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 2; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1.

3-8-5.1.
Compliance check.

As used in this section the term “compliance check” means the sending of a minor into a retail outlet to see if that minor could purchase alcohol. As used in this section the term “purchase survey” refers to compliance checks that are a part of a statewide survey.

Underage individuals acting as agents for the state or municipal police department may purchase, with impunity from prosecution, alcohol for the purposes of law enforcement, provided that the underage individuals are supervised by an adult law enforcement official. Any individual participating in an unannounced compliance check and/or purchase survey must state his/her accurate age if asked by the employee of the licensed establishment being checked.

If the compliance check is a part of a general enforcement operation and results in the sale of alcohol to the minor, the manager of the retail outlet shall be notified within 48 hours of the violation. If the compliance check is a part of a purchase survey and results in the sale of alcohol to the minor, the manager of the retail outlet shall be notified of the violation upon completion of the purchase survey in that community.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 205, § 1.

3-8-6.
Unlawful drinking and misrepresentation by underage persons — Identification cards for persons twenty-one and older. [Effective until July 1, 2023.]

It is unlawful for:

A person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday to enter any premises licensed for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for the purpose of purchasing or having served or delivered to him or her alcoholic beverages; or

A person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday to consume any alcoholic beverage on premises licensed for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages or to purchase, attempt to purchase, or have another purchase for him or her any alcoholic beverage; or

A person to misrepresent or misstate his or her age, or the age of any other persons, or to misrepresent his or her age through the presentation of any of the following documents:

An armed service identification card, valid passport, the identification card license, or any other documentation used for identification purposes that may belong to any other person who is twenty-one (21) years or older;

A motor vehicle operator’s license that bears the date of birth of the licensee and that is issued by this state or any other state;

A Rhode Island identification card, as defined in subsection (b), for the purpose of inducing any licensee, or any employee of any licensee, to sell, serve, or deliver any alcoholic beverage to a minor.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to any person who has reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday a Rhode Island identification card upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25), and, upon presentation of a certified birth or baptismal certificate, or U.S. or foreign passport, or U.S. naturalization certificate or a valid immigrant or refugee document issued by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, including, but not limited to, any one of the following: Form I-551, Form I-94, Form I-688A, Form I-688, and a form evidencing that the applicant is a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program, together with a document bearing the applicant’s signature.

A person who has reached his or her fifty-ninth (59th) birthday is not required to pay the fee.

Each registration card shall be subject to renewal every five (5) years upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

No person who holds an operator’s license issued by this state or any other state shall be issued a Rhode Island identification card.

The identification card shall be signed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and by the applicant and his or her picture shall appear on the card along with the required information and the card shall be encased in laminated plastic. The card shall be two inches (2") in height and four inches (4") in length and shall be printed in the following form:

The identification cards shall be produced at the adult correctional institutions if they have facilities to do so; if the adult correctional institutions have no facilities to do so, then all cards shall be manufactured by the lowest responsible bidder following advertisement for the solicitation of bids.

The identification cards shall be clearly distinguishable from those issued pursuant to §

3-8-6.1

and operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses issued pursuant to title 31.

Any person who has been designated as permanently and totally disabled by the social security administration or who upon certification by an optometrist, ophthalmologist, or physician that a holder of a valid and current motor vehicle operator’s license is no longer able to operate a motor vehicle, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to such person, upon request, a Rhode Island identification card for the unexpired term of the person’s motor vehicle operator’s license at no additional cost. Thereafter, a renewal of such card shall be subject to the standard renewal charge of twenty-five dollars ($25) until the person shall reach his or her fifty-ninth (59th) birthday.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon presentation of a United States Department of Defense (DD) FORM 214 or other acceptable documentation of military service and verification of an honorable discharge, issue an identification card to the presenter that is clearly marked “veteran,” at no additional cost.

Every retail Class A, B, C, and D licensee shall cause to be kept a book or photographic reproduction equipment that provides the same information as required by the book. That licensee or the licensee’s employee shall require any person who has shown a document as set forth in this section substantiating his or her age to sign that book or to permit the taking of his or her photograph and indicate what document was presented. Use of the photographic reproduction equipment is voluntary for every Class A, B, C and D licensee.

The sign-in-as-minor book and photographic reproduction equipment shall be prescribed, published, and approved at the direction and control of the division. The book shall contain at least four hundred (400) pages; shall be uniform throughout the state; and shall be distributed at a cost not to exceed seven dollars ($7.00).

If a person whose age is in question signs the sign-in-as-minor book or has a photograph taken before he or she is sold any alcoholic beverage and it is later determined that the person had not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday at the time of sale, it is considered prima facie evidence that the licensee and/or the licensee’s agent or servant acted in good faith in selling any alcoholic beverage to the person producing the document as set forth in this section misrepresenting his or her age.

Proof of good-faith reliance on any misrepresentation is a defense to the prosecution of the licensee and/or the licensee’s agent or servant for an alleged violation of this section.

Any person who violates this section shall be punished for the first offense by a mandatory fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be further punished by thirty (30) hours of community service and shall be further punished by a suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privileges for a period of thirty (30) days; for the second offense by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) and shall be further punished by forty (40) hours of community service and will be further punished by a suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privileges for a period of three (3) months; and for the third and subsequent offenses by a mandatory fine for each offense of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be further punished by fifty (50) hours of community service and will be further punished by a suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privileges for a period of one year.

Any suspension of an operator’s license or driving privilege pursuant to this section shall not operate to affect the insurance rating of the offender and any operator’s license or driving privilege suspended pursuant to this section shall be reinstated without further expense upon application.

Within thirty (30) days after this incident the police chief of the city or town where the incident took place is directed to inform, in writing, the department of business regulation whether or not charges in accordance with this section have been preferred against a person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and has violated this section. If no charge is brought against any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and has violated the provisions of this section, then the police chief of the city or town where the incident took place will state the reason for his or her failure to charge the person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday.

The Rhode Island identification card may be withdrawn at any time for just cause, at the discretion of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall keep a record of the cards issued and each card shall contain an identification number specifically assigned to the person to whom the card was issued.

Issuance of a Rhode Island identification card under this section to a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program shall not confer the right to vote in the state of Rhode Island.

RHODE ISLAND IDENTIFICATION CARD Date Issued No. First Name Middle Name Last Name Address BIRTH RECORD Month Day Year Secure Color of Color of Sex Ht. Wt. Photo hair eyes by Pasting here Issued by Administrator of the Division of Motor Vehicles Administrator

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2177, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 498, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 590, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 11; P.L. 1998, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 35, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 2.

3-8-6.
Unlawful drinking and misrepresentation by underage persons — Identification cards for persons twenty-one and older. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

It is unlawful for:

A person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday to enter any premises licensed for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for the purpose of purchasing or having served or delivered to him or her alcoholic beverages; or

A person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday to consume any alcoholic beverage on premises licensed for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages or to purchase, attempt to purchase, or have another purchase for him or her any alcoholic beverage; or

A person to misrepresent or misstate his or her age, or the age of any other persons, or to misrepresent his or her age through the presentation of any of the following documents:

An armed service identification card, valid passport, the identification card license, or any other documentation used for identification purposes that may belong to any other person who is twenty-one (21) years or older;

A motor vehicle operator’s license or a driver privilege card issued pursuant to §

31-10.4-2

that bears the date of birth of the licensee and that is issued by this state or any other state;

A Rhode Island identification card, as defined in subsection (b), for the purpose of inducing any licensee, or any employee of any licensee, to sell, serve, or deliver any alcoholic beverage to a minor.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to any person who has reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday a Rhode Island identification card upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25), and, upon presentation of a certified birth or baptismal certificate, or U.S. or foreign passport, or U.S. naturalization certificate or a valid immigrant or refugee document issued by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, including, but not limited to, any one of the following: Form I-551, Form I-94, Form I-688A, Form I-688, and a form evidencing that the applicant is a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program, together with a document bearing the applicant’s signature.

A person who has reached his or her fifty-ninth (59th) birthday is not required to pay the fee.

Each registration card shall be subject to renewal every five (5) years upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

No person who holds an operator’s license or a driver privilege card issued by this state or any other state shall be issued a Rhode Island identification card.

The identification card shall be signed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and by the applicant and his or her picture shall appear on the card along with the required information and the card shall be encased in laminated plastic. The card shall be two inches (2") in height and four inches (4") in length and shall be printed in the following form:

The identification cards shall be produced at the adult correctional institutions if they have facilities to do so; if the adult correctional institutions have no facilities to do so, then all cards shall be manufactured by the lowest responsible bidder following advertisement for the solicitation of bids.

The identification cards shall be clearly distinguishable from those issued pursuant to §

3-8-6.1

and operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses issued pursuant to title 31.

Any person who has been designated as permanently and totally disabled by the social security administration or who upon certification by an optometrist, ophthalmologist, or physician that a holder of a valid and current motor vehicle operator’s license is no longer able to operate a motor vehicle, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to such person, upon request, a Rhode Island identification card for the unexpired term of the person’s motor vehicle operator’s license at no additional cost. Thereafter, a renewal of such card shall be subject to the standard renewal charge of twenty-five dollars ($25) until the person shall reach his or her fifty-ninth (59th) birthday.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon presentation of a United States Department of Defense (DD) FORM 214 or other acceptable documentation of military service and verification of an honorable discharge, issue an identification card to the presenter that is clearly marked “veteran,” at no additional cost.

Every retail Class A, B, C, and D licensee shall cause to be kept a book or photographic reproduction equipment that provides the same information as required by the book. That licensee or the licensee’s employee shall require any person who has shown a document as set forth in this section substantiating his or her age to sign that book or to permit the taking of his or her photograph and indicate what document was presented. Use of the photographic reproduction equipment is voluntary for every Class A, B, C, and D licensee.

The sign-in-as-minor book and photographic reproduction equipment shall be prescribed, published, and approved at the direction and control of the division. The book shall contain at least four hundred (400) pages; shall be uniform throughout the state; and shall be distributed at a cost not to exceed seven dollars ($7.00).

If a person whose age is in question signs the sign-in-as-minor book or has a photograph taken before he or she is sold any alcoholic beverage and it is later determined that the person had not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday at the time of sale, it is considered prima facie evidence that the licensee and/or the licensee’s agent or servant acted in good faith in selling any alcoholic beverage to the person producing the document as set forth in this section misrepresenting his or her age.

Proof of good-faith reliance on any misrepresentation is a defense to the prosecution of the licensee and/or the licensee’s agent or servant for an alleged violation of this section.

Any person who violates this section shall be punished for the first offense by a mandatory fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be further punished by thirty (30) hours of community service and shall be further punished by a suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privileges for a period of thirty (30) days; for the second offense by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) and shall be further punished by forty (40) hours of community service and will be further punished by a suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privileges for a period of three (3) months; and for the third and subsequent offenses by a mandatory fine for each offense of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be further punished by fifty (50) hours of community service and will be further punished by a suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privileges for a period of one year.

Any suspension of an operator’s license or driving privilege pursuant to this section shall not operate to affect the insurance rating of the offender and any operator’s license or driving privilege suspended pursuant to this section shall be reinstated without further expense upon application.

Within thirty (30) days after this incident the police chief of the city or town where the incident took place is directed to inform, in writing, the department of business regulation whether or not charges in accordance with this section have been preferred against a person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and has violated this section. If no charge is brought against any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and has violated the provisions of this section, then the police chief of the city or town where the incident took place will state the reason for his or her failure to charge the person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday.

The Rhode Island identification card may be withdrawn at any time for just cause, at the discretion of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall keep a record of the cards issued and each card shall contain an identification number specifically assigned to the person to whom the card was issued.

Issuance of a Rhode Island identification card under this section to a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program shall not confer the right to vote in the state of Rhode Island.

RHODE ISLAND IDENTIFICATION CARD Date Issued No. First Name Middle Name Last Name Address BIRTH RECORD Month Day Year Secure Color of Color of Sex Ht. Wt. Photo hair eyes by Pasting here Issued by Administrator of the Division of Motor Vehicles Administrator

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 165, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2177, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 498, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 590, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 11; P.L. 1998, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 35, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

3-8-6.1.
Identification cards for persons under the age of 21. [Effective until July 1, 2023.]

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to any person upon request, who is under twenty-one (21) years of age, an identification card upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and, upon presentation of a certified birth or baptismal certificate, or U.S. or foreign passport, or U.S. naturalization certificate, or a valid immigrant or refugee document issued by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services including, but not limited to, any one of the following: Form I-551, Form I-94, Form I-688A, Form I-688, and a form evidencing that the applicant is a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program, together with a document bearing the applicant’s signature. No person who holds an operator’s license, issued by this state or any other state, shall be issued an identification card.

The identification card shall be subject to renewal every five (5) years upon the payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The identification card shall be signed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and also by the applicant, and his or her picture shall appear on the card along with the required information and the card shall be encased in laminated plastic. The card shall be two inches (2") in height and four inches (4") in length and shall be printed in the following form:

The identification cards shall be produced at the adult correctional institution if they have facilities to do so; if the adult correctional institutions have no facilities to do so, then all cards shall be manufactured by the lowest responsible bidder following advertisement for the solicitation of bids.

The identification cards shall be clearly distinguishable from those issued pursuant to §

3-8-6

and operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses issued pursuant to title 31.

The identification card may be withdrawn at any time for just cause, at the discretion of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall keep a record of the cards issued and each card shall contain an identification number specifically assigned to the person to whom the card was issued.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon presentation of a United States Department of Defense (DD) FORM 214 or other acceptable documentation of military service and verification of an honorable discharge, issue an identification card to the presenter that is clearly marked “veteran,” at no additional cost.

Issuance of a Rhode Island identification card under this section to a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program shall not confer the right to vote in the state of Rhode Island.

IDENTIFICATION CARD Date Issued No. First Name Middle Name Last Name Address BIRTH RECORD Month Day Year Secure Color of Color of Sex Ht. Wt. Photo hair eyes by Pasting here Issued by Administrator of the Division of Motor Vehicles Administrator

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 534, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 35, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 2.

3-8-6.1.
Identification cards for persons under the age of 21. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to any person upon request, who is under twenty-one (21) years of age, an identification card upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and, upon presentation of a certified birth or baptismal certificate, or U.S. or foreign passport, or U.S. naturalization certificate, or a valid immigrant or refugee document issued by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services including, but not limited to, any one of the following: Form I-551, Form I-94, Form I-688A, Form I-688, and a form evidencing that the applicant is a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program, together with a document bearing the applicant’s signature. No person who holds an operator’s license or a driver privilege card, issued by this state or any other state, shall be issued an identification card.

The identification card shall be subject to renewal every five (5) years upon the payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The identification card shall be signed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and also by the applicant, and his or her picture shall appear on the card along with the required information and the card shall be encased in laminated plastic. The card shall be two inches (2") in height and four inches (4") in length and shall be printed in the following form:

The identification cards shall be produced at the adult correctional institution if they have facilities to do so; if the adult correctional institutions have no facilities to do so, then all cards shall be manufactured by the lowest responsible bidder following advertisement for the solicitation of bids.

The identification cards shall be clearly distinguishable from those issued pursuant to §

3-8-6

and operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses issued pursuant to title 31.

The identification card may be withdrawn at any time for just cause, at the discretion of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall keep a record of the cards issued and each card shall contain an identification number specifically assigned to the person to whom the card was issued.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon presentation of a United States Department of Defense (DD) FORM 214 or other acceptable documentation of military service and verification of an honorable discharge, issue an identification card to the presenter that is clearly marked “veteran,” at no additional cost.

Issuance of a Rhode Island identification card under this section to a current or past recipient of a grant of deferred action under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program shall not confer the right to vote in the state of Rhode Island.

IDENTIFICATION CARD Date Issued No. First Name Middle Name Last Name Address BIRTH RECORD Month Day Year Secure Color of Color of Sex Ht. Wt. Photo hair eyes by Pasting here Issued by Administrator of the Division of Motor Vehicles Administrator

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 534, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 35, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

3-8-6.2.
Unlawful use of identification cards.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in his or her possession any cancelled, revoked, suspended, fictitious, or fraudulently altered official Rhode Island identification card;

To lend his or her Rhode Island identification card to any other person or knowingly permit the use of the card by another person;

To display or represent as one’s own the Rhode Island identification card of another;

To fail or refuse to surrender to the division of motor vehicles upon lawful demand any Rhode Island identification card which has been suspended, revoked, or cancelled;

To use a false or fictitious name in any application for a Rhode Island identification card or to knowingly make a false statement or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in any such application;

To knowingly permit any unlawful use of his or her Rhode Island identification card; and

To aid or assist another to fraudulently obtain a Rhode Island identification card.

Any violation of subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(7) of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 283, § 1.

3-8-6.3.
Manufacture or distribution of fraudulent identification cards or licenses to operate a motor vehicle.

It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture or distribute a fraudulent identification card, as defined in §§

11-18-20.1

and

3-8-6

, or a fraudulent license to operate a motor vehicle.

Each incident of manufacturing or distributing a fraudulent identification card or a fraudulent license to operate a motor vehicle shall be considered a separate and distinct offense.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a criminal violation and shall be subject to the following:

For a first offense, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500);

For a second offense, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1000);

For a third or subsequent offense, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2000).

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 2.

3-8-7 — 3-8-8.1.
Repealed.

3-8-9.
Transportation of alcoholic beverages by underage persons.

Any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and who operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways, except when accompanied by a parent, legal guardian, or another adult who is over the age of twenty-one (21) years and related, whether by blood, adoption or marriage, to the operator within the following degree of sanguinity: brother, sister, grandfather, grandmother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, half-sister, uncle, aunt, great uncle or great aunt and, knowingly having liquor or intoxicating beverages in any form in containers, opened or unopened, in any part of the vehicle shall be guilty of a criminal violation. The words liquor and intoxicating beverages, as used in this section, have the same meaning as defined in chapter 1 of this title. This section does not apply to persons between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-one (21) who are transporting unopened alcoholic beverages in the course of their employment.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the following:

For a first offense, a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for not more than thirty (30) days;

For a second offense, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for not more than ninety (90) days;

For a third or subsequent offense, a fine of no less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than nine hundred and fifty dollars ($950) and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 1.